Maryland, session 2026, SB0454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
4–318.
(d) (1) [Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, a] A Baltimore
City school police officer has all the powers of a law enforcement officer in the State.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0454*

SENATE BILL 454
(2) (i) A Baltimore City school police officer may act in an official
capacity only on the premises of schools and any other property used for educational
purposes owned, leased, or operated by, or under the control of the Baltimore City Board of
School Commissioners.
(ii) A Baltimore City school police officer may not act in an official
capacity on any other property unless:
1. Engaged in fresh pursuit of a suspected offender;
2. Requested or authorized to do so by the Police
Commissioner of Baltimore City;
3. The exercise of power is necessary to facilitate the orderly
flow of traffic to and from property owned, leased, operated by, or under the control of the
Baltimore City School System; or
4. Ordered to do so by the Mayor of Baltimore City.
[(3) (i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a Baltimore City
school police officer whose permanent or temporary assignment is at a school or on school
property may carry a firearm on the premises of the school to which the officer is assigned
before or after regular school hours on school days and on days other than school days.
(ii) The Baltimore City Board of School Commissioners shall
establish policies to implement the provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.]
7–1501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “School resource officer” means:
(1) A law enforcement officer as defined under § 1–101(c) of the Public
Safety Article who has been assigned to a school in accordance with a memorandum of
understanding between the chief of a law enforcement agency as defined under § 3–201(d)
of the Public Safety Article and the local education agency; or
(2) A Baltimore City school police officer, as defined in § 4–318 of this
article.
7–1508.
(a) (1) Each local school system shall designate a school safety coordinator.
(2) A designated school safety coordinator shall:

SENATE BILL 454 3
(i) Be certified by the Center; and
(ii) Serve as a liaison between the local school system, the local law
enforcement agency, and the Center.
(B) A SCHOOL RESOURCE OFFICER SHALL CARRY A FIREARM WHILE
PRESENT ON THE PREMISES OF THE SCHOOL TO WHICH THE OFFICER IS ASSIGNED.
[(b)] (C) (1) (i) On or before September 1, 2018, the Center, in
consultation with local school systems, shall:
1. Develop a specialized curriculum for use in training of
school resource officers and school security employees; and
2. Submit the curriculum to the Maryland Police Training
and Standards Commission for approval.
(ii) The specialized curriculum developed under this subsection shall
include training in:
1. De–escalation;
2. Disability awareness;
3. Maintaining a positive school climate;
4. Constructive interactions with students; and
5. Implicit bias and disability and diversity awareness with
specific attention to racial and ethnic disparities.
(iii) 1. The specialized curriculum developed under this
subsection may not go into effect until it is approved by the Maryland Police Training and
Standards Commission.
2. If the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission does not initially approve the specialized curriculum, the Center shall amend
the curriculum until it meets with the Commission’s approval.
(2) On or before March 1, 2019, the Center shall develop and submit to the
Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission for approval a model training
program that meets the requirements of the curriculum approved under paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
(3) Each local law enforcement agency shall:
(i) Enroll individuals assigned to be school resource officers in the

SENATE BILL 454
model training program developed by the Center under paragraph (2) of this subsection; or
(ii) 1. Submit to the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission for approval a training program that is consistent with the curriculum
developed under paragraph (1) of this subsection; and
2. Enroll individuals assigned to be school resource officers
in the training program developed under item 1 of this item.
(4) Beginning September 1, 2019, to be assigned as a school resource officer
an individual shall:
(i) Complete:
1. The model training program developed by the Center
under paragraph (2) of this subsection through instruction provided by the Center in
collaboration with the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission; or
2. A local law enforcement agency’s training program
developed under paragraph (3)(ii) of this subsection; and
(ii) Be certified by the Maryland Police Training and Standards
Commission.
(5) Beginning September 1, 2019, to be employed as a school security
employee at a public school, an individual shall complete:
(i) The model training program developed by the Center under
paragraph (2) of this subsection through instruction provided by the Center in collaboration
with the Maryland Police Training and Standards Commission; or
(ii) A local law enforcement agency’s training program developed
under paragraph (3)(ii) of this subsection.
[(c)] (D) The Center shall collect data regarding the school resource officers in
each local school system, including:
(1) The number of full–time and part–time school resource officers
assigned to each elementary school, middle school, and high school; and
(2) Any other local school system employees or local law enforcement
officers who are fulfilling the role of a school resource officer.
[(d)] (E) (1) On or before December 15, 2018, the Center, in collaboration
with local law enforcement agencies and local school systems, shall analyze the initial data
collected under subsection [(c)] (D) of this section and develop guidelines to assist local
school systems in:

SENATE BILL 454 5
(i) Identifying the appropriate number and assignment of school
resource officers, including supplemental coverage by local law enforcement agencies; and
(ii) Collaborating and communicating with local law enforcement
agencies.
(2) On or before July 1, 2019, each local school system, in consultation with
local law enforcement agencies, shall:
(i) Develop a plan to implement the guidelines developed by the
Center; and
(ii) Submit the plan to the Center for review and comment.
[(e)] (F) (1) Before the 2018–2019 school year begins, each local school
system shall file a report with the Center identifying:
(i) The public high schools in the local school system’s jurisdiction
that have a school resource officer assigned to the school; and
(ii) If a public high school in the local school system’s jurisdiction is
not assigned a school resource officer, the adequate local law enforcement coverage that
will be provided to the public high school.
(2) Beginning with the 2019–2020 school year, and each school year
thereafter, before the school year begins, each local school system shall, in accordance with
the plan developed under subsection [(d)(2)] (E)(2) of this section, file a report identifying:
(i) The public schools in the local school system’s jurisdiction that
have a school resource officer assigned to the school; and
(ii) If a public school in the local school system’s jurisdiction is not
assigned a school resource officer, the adequate local law enforcement coverage that will be
provided to the public school.
(3) On or before October 1, 2018, and each October 1 thereafter, the Center
shall submit a summary of the reports required under this subsection to the Governor and,
in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
[(f)] (G) Each local school system shall post on the school system’s website
information on the role and authority of school resource officers assigned to public schools
within the school system.
[(g)] (H) (1) For fiscal year 2020 and each fiscal year thereafter, the Governor
shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $10,000,000 for the purpose of
providing grants to local school systems and local law enforcement agencies to assist in

SENATE BILL 454
meeting the requirements of subsection [(e)] (F) of this section.
(2) Grants provided under this subsection shall be made to each local
school system based on the number of schools in each school system in proportion to the
total number of public schools in the State in the prior year.
[(h)] (I) A local school system may use funds provided under subsection [(g)]
(H) of this section for school security employees.
[(i)] (J) (1) The Center shall collect data on incidents of use of force between:
(i) Any school resource officer and a student while a school resource
officer is carrying out the officer’s duties; and
(ii) Any school security employee and a student while the school
security employee is carrying out the employee’s duties.
(2) On or before December 1, 2020, and each December 1 thereafter, the
Center shall submit a report on the data collected under paragraph (1) of this subsection
for each jurisdiction, in accordance with federal and State law, to the Governor and, in
accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.